Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Article 2. Public Building Safety Law.

§§ 27-63,
27-64.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 199.

§ 27-65.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

§ 27-66.
Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 613.

§ 27-66.1.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 258.

Cross references.

As to qualifications of State Fire Marshal, see now §

36-139.2

.

§ 27-67.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

Cross references.

For present provision relating to the qualifications, powers, and duties of the State Fire Marshal, see §

9.1-206

.

§ 27-68.
Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 613.

§ 27-69.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

Cross references.

For present provision relating to qualifications of the State Fire Marshal, see §

9.1-206

.

§ 27-70.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

Cross references.

For present provision relating to qualifications of the State Fire Marshal, see §

9.1-206

.

§ 27-70.1.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 199.

§ 27-70.2.
Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

§ 27-71.
Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 613.

§ 27-72.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 199.

§ 27-73.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 258.

§ 27-73.1.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 199.

§§ 27-74 through 27-77.

Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 613.

§§ 27-78,
27-78.1.

Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 258.

Cross references.

As to inspection of certain state-owned and state-operated facilities, including, residential care facilities, and enforcement of safety standards, see §

9.1-207

.

§ 27-79.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 199.

§§ 27-79.1 through 27-79.8.

Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

§ 27-79.9.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 258.

Cross references.

As to inspection of state-owned and state-operated facilities, including residential care facilities, and enforcement of safety standards, see §

9.1-207

.

§§ 27-80 through 27-84.

Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 199.

Editor’s note.

Section 27-83.1 was previously repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

§§ 27-85,
27-85.1.

Repealed by Acts 1981, c. 499.

§ 27-85.2.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 258.

Cross references.

As to agreements between the Department of Fire Safety and other agencies for services related fire safety in public buildings, see §

9.1-208

.